Utah statutes.
19-1-105.   Divisions of department -- Control by division directors.

(1)  The following divisions are created within the department:

(a)  the Division of Air Quality, to administer Title 19, Chapter 2, Air Conservation Act;

(b)  the Division of Drinking Water, to administer Title 19, Chapter 4, Safe Drinking Water Act;

(c)  the Division of Environmental Response and Remediation, to administer:

(i)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 3, Hazardous Substances Mitigation Act; and

(ii)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 4, Underground Storage Tank Act;

(d)  the Division of Radiation Control, to administer Title 19, Chapter 3, Radiation Control Act;

(e)  the Division of Solid and Hazardous Waste, to administer:

(i)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act;

(ii)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 2, Hazardous Waste Facility Siting Act;

(iii)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 5, Solid Waste Management Act;

(iv)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 6, Lead Acid Battery Disposal;

(v)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 7, Used Oil Management Act;

(vi)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 8, Waste Tire Recycling Act;

(vii)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 10, Mercury Switch Removal Act;

(viii)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 11, Industrial Byproduct Reuse; and

(ix)  Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 12, Disposal of Electronic Waste Program; and

(f)  the Division of Water Quality, to administer Title 19, Chapter 5, Water Quality Act.

(2)  Each division is under the immediate direction and control of a division director appointed by the executive director.

(3) (a)  A division director shall possess the administrative skills and training necessary to perform the duties of division director.

(b)  A division director shall hold one of the following degrees from an accredited college or university:

(i)  a four-year degree in physical or biological science or engineering;

(ii)  a related degree; or

(iii)  a degree in law.

(4)  The executive director may remove a division director at will.

(5)  A division director shall serve as the executive secretary to the policymaking board, created in Section 19-1-106, that has rulemaking authority over the division director's division.



Amended by Chapter 360, 2012 General Session

